test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-dejot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - dejot: # Verb 'eng dance/fin tanssia' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/dejot/
     dejot+V+TV+Inf: dejot
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg1: dejošu
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg2: dejosi
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl1: dejosim
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl2: dejosiet
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Fut+SP3: dejos

     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dejoju
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dejo
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: dejojam
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: dejojat
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+SP3: dejo

     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: dejoju
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: dejoji
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: dejojām
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: dejojāt
     dejot+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: dejoja

     dejot+V+TV+Deb+Prs: jādejo
     dejot+V+TV+Quo+Prs: dejojot
     dejot+V+TV+Quo+Fut: dejošot
     dejot+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: dejo
     dejot+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: dejojiet

     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojošs
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojoša
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojošam
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojošu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojošā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojoši
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojošu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojošiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojošus
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojošos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojošais
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojošā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojošajam
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojošo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojošajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dejojošais, dejojošo]
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojošie
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojošo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojošajiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojošos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojošajos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojošie
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojoša
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojošas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojošai
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojošu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojošā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojošas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojošu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojošām
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojošas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojošās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojošā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojošās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojošajai
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojošo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojošajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dejojošā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojošās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojošo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojošajām
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojošās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojošajās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojošās

     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojis
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojuša
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojušam
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojušu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojušā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojuši
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojušu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojušiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojušus
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojušos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojušais
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojušā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojušajam
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojušo
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojušajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: dejojušais
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojušie
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojušo
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojušajiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojušos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojušajos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojušie
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojusi
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojušas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojušai
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojušu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojušā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojušas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojušu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojušām
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojušas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojušās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojusī
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojušās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojušajai
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojušo
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojušajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dejojusī
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojušās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojušo
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojušajām
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojušās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojušajās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojušās

     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojams
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojama
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojamam
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojamu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojamā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojami
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojamu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojamiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojamus
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojamos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojamais
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojamā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojamajam
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojamo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojamajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dejojamais, dejojamo]
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojamie
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojamo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojamajiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojamos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojamajos
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojamie
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejojama
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejojamas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejojamai
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejojamu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejojamā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejojamas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejojamu
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejojamām
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejojamas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejojamās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dejojamā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dejojamās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dejojamajai
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dejojamo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dejojamajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dejojamā
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dejojamās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dejojamo
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dejojamajām
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dejojamās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dejojamajās
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dejojamās

     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejots
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejota
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejotam
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejotu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejotā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejoti
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejotu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejotiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejotus
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejotos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dejotais
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dejotā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dejotajam
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dejoto
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dejotajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dejotais, dejoto]
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dejotie
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dejoto
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dejotajiem
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dejotos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dejotajos
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dejotie
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejota
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dejotas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dejotai
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dejotu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dejotā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejotas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dejotu
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dejotām
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dejotas
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dejotās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dejotā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dejotās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dejotajai
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dejoto
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dejotajā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dejotā
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dejotās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dejoto
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dejotajām
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dejotās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dejotajās
     dejot+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dejotās
#"Declension":"4"
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: dejošana
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: dejošanas
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: dejošanai
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: dejošanu
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: dejošanā
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: dejošana
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: dejošanas
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: dejošanu
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: dejošanām
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: dejošanas
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: dejošanās
     dejot+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: dejošanas
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejodams
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dejodama
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejodami
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dejodamas

#     dejot+V+TV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši
